District of Columbia statutes.
47-2886.07

Omitted

District of Columbia Board of Registration for Professional Engineers — Meetings; officers; quorum.

Omitted.

The provisions of former § 2-2307 1981 Ed. have been omitted as obsolete, the Board referred to herein having been abolished.

Board of Registration for Professional Engineers abolished. See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-2886.05.

Section 302 of D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.

1981 Ed., § 2-2307.